Utah statutes.
46-4-201.   Legal recognition of electronic records, electronic signatures, and electronic contracts.

(1)  A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.

(2)  A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation.

(3)  If a law requires a record to be in writing, an electronic record satisfies the law.

(4)  If a law requires a signature, an electronic signature satisfies the law.



Enacted by Chapter 74, 2000 General Session

